Utah statutes.
62A-17-104.   Utah 211 created -- Responsibilities.

(1)  The designated 211 service provider described in Section 62A-17-102 shall be known as Utah 211.

(2)  Utah 211 shall, as appropriations allow:

(a)  by 2014:

(i)  provide the services described in this Subsection (2) 24 hours a day, seven days a week;

(ii)  abide by the key standards for 211 programs, as specified in the Standards for Professional Information and Referral Requirements for Alliance of Information Systems Accreditation and Operating 211 systems; and

(iii)  be a point of entry for disaster-related information and referral;

(b)  track types of calls received and referrals made;

(c)  develop, coordinate, and implement a statewide information and referral system that integrates existing community-based structures with state and local agencies;

(d)  provide information relating to:

(i)  health and human services; and

(ii)  volunteer opportunities;

(e)  create an online, searchable database to provide information to the public about the health and human services provided by public or private entities throughout the state, and ensure that:

(i)  the material on the searchable database is indexed:

(A)  geographically to inform an individual about the health and human services provided in the area where the individual lives; and

(B)  by type of service provided; and

(ii)  the searchable database contains links to the Internet sites of any local provider of health and human services, if possible, and include:

(A)  the name, address, and phone number of organizations providing health and human services in a county; and

(B)  a description of the type of services provided;

(f)  be responsible, in collaboration with state agencies, for raising community awareness about available health and human services; and

(g)  host meetings on a quarterly basis until calendar year 2014, and on a biannual basis beginning in 2014, to seek input and guidance from state agencies, local governments, community-based organizations, not-for-profit organizations, and faith-based organizations.



Enacted by Chapter 24, 2013 General Session

